Hawaii, session 2026, GM1159.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the people of Hawai‘i
have a long tradition of protecting an individual's right to
privacy and bodily autonomy independently of, and more broadly
than, the United States Constitution. In 2023, the legislature
took one of its constitutionally required affirmative steps to
implement the right to privacy by passing Act 2, Session Laws of
Hawaii 2023 (Act 2), which protected an individual's right to
privacy and bodily autonomy within the boundaries of the State,
including minors, and declared that the laws of other states
authorizing civil actions and criminal prosecutions for
receiving, seeking, providing, or aiding and abetting the
provision of reproductive health care services are contrary to
the State's public policy and prohibit recognition and
enforcement of other states' laws that impose civil or criminal
liability relating to reproductive health care services.
The legislature further finds that since the passage of
Act 2, some states have pursued laws and policies purporting to
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx
IIUMKIlilinUinDHiU

Page 2
H.B. NO.
impose civil or criminal liability, professional disciplinary
actions, or otherwise allow for the initiation of abusive
litigation in connection with the provision or receipt of, or
assistance with, gender-affirming health care services outside
of these states' borders.
It is the policy of this State that the rights of equality,
liberty, and privacy guaranteed under article I, sections 3, 5,
and 6, of the Hawaii State Constitution are fundamental rights
and that those rights include an individual's right to make
health care decisions about one's own body, including the right
to seek and receive health care services that affirm their
expressed gender. Due to the shifting legal landscape regarding
the right to privacy and an individual's bodily autonomy, the
legislature finds it is imperative to reiterate and bolster the
State's policy to affirm protection of these rights and freedoms
within the state boundaries.
The legislature notes that the term "abusive litigation" is
not intended to include standard health care actions or
activities of a health payor regarding insurance coverage
status, fraud, waste, or the lawful activities of a health payor
to enforce its rights under a contract with a person or entity.
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx
IliHIUNIIINMiiniilWin

Page 3 H.B. NO. ^0=2
The legislature further notes that this Act does not expand
required health care coverage of any treatments or services or
create any new mandates for health insurance coverage in Hawaii.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Expand protections of reproductive health care
services established by Act 2, Session Laws of Hawaii
2023, to include gender-affirming health care services
and clarify permitted disclosures of protected health
information to address changes in federal regulations;
(2) Establish protections against abusive litigation; and
(3) Prohibit medical malpractice insurers and health
carriers from taking certain adverse actions against
health care providers solely on the basis that the
health care provider provides lawful reproductive or
gender-affirming health care services.
SECTION 2. Chapter 323J, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding three new sections to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
”§323J- Abusive litigation; prohibited; remedies.
If a person or entity, whether or not acting under the color of
law, engages in or attempts to engage in abusive litigation, or
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 3
MiMRIBillMHIHMiniHi

Page 4 1875
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
attempts to enforce any order or judgment issued in connection
with any abusive litigation, any aggrieved person may bring a
civil action against that person or entity in the circuit court
of the circuit in which the aggrieved person resides or in which
the aggrieved person accessed, received, provided, facilitated,
or attempted to access, receive provide, or facilitate
reproductive health care services or gender-affirming health
care services. The civil actions may be for;
(1) Injunctive relief;
(2) Actual damages, including the amount of any judgment
issued in connection with the abusive litigation;
(3) Expenses, costs, and reasonable attorneys' fees
incurred in connection with the abusive litigation;
(4) Expenses, costs, and reasonable attorneys' fees
incurred to bring an action under this section; and
JAL Punitive damages.
(b) Any civil action filed pursuant to this section shall
be filed within six years after the date the abusive litigation
is commenced, or if the person or entity is attempting to
enforce an order or a judgment, within six years after the date
enforcement is attempted.
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx

Page 5
H.B. NO.
(c) Notwithstanding any provision of this section^ the
requirements set forth herein shall not apply to prohibit
standard health care actions or activities of a health payor
regarding insurance coverage status/ fraud, waste, or lawful
activities of a health payor to enforce its rights under a
contract with a person or entity.
(d) For the purposes of this section:
"Abusive litigation" means any litigation or other legal
action, including civil, criminal, or administrative action,
brought against another person or entity for accessing,
receiving, providing, facilitating, or attempting to access,
receive, provide, or facilitate reproductive health care
services or gender-affirming health care services that are
lawful under the laws of this State.
"Aggrieved person" means:
(1) A person or entity against whom abusive litigation is
filed or prosecuted or against whom an orde'r or
judgment issued in connection with such abusive
litigation is attempted to be enforced; or
(2) The employer or principal of a person against whom
abusive litigation is filed or prosecuted or against
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 5
■nHiHinsMiiiiiiii

Page 6
H.B. NO.
whom an order or a jud^ment is^ued 3ji connection wi^
such abusive litigation is attempted to be enforced if
the action that forms the basis of the abusive
litigation was performed within the scope of the
person's employment or agency relationship.
§323J- Medical malpractice insurance; prohibited
actions. (a) Any insurer that issues medical malpractice
insurance in this State shall not take a prohibited action
against an applicant for, or the named insured under, a medical
malpractice policy in this State solely because the applicant or
insured has provided, or assisted in the provision of,
reproductive health care services or gender-affirming health
care services or made a referral for reproductive health care
services or gender-affirming health care services; provided that
the care provided by the applicant or insured was consistent
with generally accepted standards of practice under the laws of
this State and did not otherwise violate the laws of this State.
(b) For the purposes of this section, "prohibited action"
means:
(1) Refusing to issue a medical malpractice policy;
(2) Canceling or terminating a medical malpractice policy;
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx
nniiMiiiiMmiiiiiiiiiii

Page 7
H.B. NO.
(3) Refusing to renew a medical malpractice policy; or
(4) Imposing any sanctions, fines, penalties, or rate
increases that are not supported by actuarial analysis
conducted in accordance with the applicable Actuarial
Standards of Practice promulgated by the Actuarial
Standards Board.
§323J- Health carriers;. prohibitions. No group health
plan or health insurance insurer offering or renewing a health
plan in this State shall terminate or refuse to renew a health
care contract with a participating health care provider on the
sole basis that the participating provider provides, or assists
in the provision of, reproductive health care services or
gender-affirming health care services.”
SECTION 3. Chapter 323J, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [-E-] CHAPTER 323J [^]
REPRODUCTIVE HEALTH CARE SERVICES AND GENDER-AFFIRMING HEALTH
CARE SERVICES
[-t] §323J-1 [-J-] Definitions. As used in this chapter,
unless the context otherwise requires:
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx
iniiiMimniimiiiH

Page 8
H.B. NO.
"Gender-affirming health care services” means a service or
product that supports and affirms an individual's actual gender
identity as defined in section 432;1-607,3, including but not
limited to all supplies, care, and services of a medical^
behavioral health, mental health, surgical, psychiatric,
therapeutic, diagnostic, preventative, rehabilitative, or
supportive nature, including medication. "Gender-affirming
health care services" includes treatment for gender dysphoria
and gender incongruence and services provided to two spirit,
mahu, transgender, nonbinary, intersex, and other gender diverse
individuals♦
"Person" includes an individual, partnership, joint
venture, corporation, association, business, trust, or any
organized group of persons or legal entity, or any combination
thereof.
"Reproductive health care services" includes all medical,
surgical, pharmaceutical, counseling, or referral services
relating to the human reproductive system, including but not
limited to services relating to pregnancy, contraception, or the
termination of a pregnancy.
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 8
llllillllWiliniliHHUIIl

Page 9
H.B. NO.
[-E-] §323J-2 [-3-- Diaclosurea prohibited. ] Protected health
information; use or disclosure, when prohibited; covered
entities; written consent. (a) [Except as provided in rules
504,—504.1,—and 505.5- of-the Hawaii rules—of ovidenee-uftd
oubooetioft——er—ae—authorized under the--Healrth -Inourance
Por-tability and Aocountabilit-y Aet- of 1996,—P-. L.—1-0-4—191 /—and
fecksr-al r-egulationo promulgated fehereaRder>—in any civil -action
or any proceeding prc-limi-nary—thereto- or in any probate,
lcgio4-ativc,—or administrative proceeding-,—no covered entity,—as-
defined in title 45 Code-of Federal Regutations section 1-60.1-03,
or as the-same as may be from- time to time amended or modified,
oha-11- disclose:
- H-)- Any -communiea-tion made to the covered entity,—or any
information obtained by the covered entity from-a
patient or the conservator>—guardian,—or other
authorized legal reprooentative of -a patient -relating
to r-cpr-oducti-vc health care- services that arc
permitted under the laws of the State;—ar
- (-20- Any information obtained by personal examination—of-a
patient relating to roprodue-tive-health care services
that arc permitted under the laws of the State,
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx
iBiiiiHiniiiniiiHiHiiiii

Page 10
H.B. NO.
unloao tho-pationt or that pationfe's conservator,—guardian,—or
other authorized legal—repreoeft-tativc explicitly oonoento to the
diocloourc in writing in the form of a-reloaoo of prot-oefeed
health information compliant with the federal -Hoa-lth I-nsu-rancc
Portability and Accountabi-lirty-ftct of 19-96/——104—1-91-/—as-
eme-ftded-:—A covered entity sha-1-1 inform the patient or the
paO-i-eftt-’-s—eenserva-feerT—guard-ias,—er-st-her^-au-feh-orizod legal
roproaentative- of- the—pat-ient' o right to-withhold--the -written
consent.
-fte-)-- W-ritten consent of the-patient or-the patient's
conse-rvator?—guardian-/—or other outhorized legal -roprosentafeive
shall not be required fer—the—dioclosurc of—the communico-tion er
infe-rmati-en
- HH- if—the ■records relate- t-e- a patient who 4-&—a—plaintiff
in- a comp la int porHiiftg -befere a court of competent
juris-dietion-al-leging- health-oaro-nogli-gcnec-and- a
request for records has been served on a named
de-fendant--in-that -litigatien;
- fS-i If -the records are—requested by a -licensing authority,
as defined in section -4-366-2/—and -the request- i-s- fttade
in—connection-with-an-i-ftvestigation of a complaint to
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 10
■l■nllmlllgillBMln

Page 11 1875
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
the lieena-irtg author-ity and the recordo arc rcjrot-ed -feo
the -complaint,—eempiaiftt—i-s-^ftede—eeieiy—©ft
tde—feaftis-^fedat-^fede—3ri-eeftftee7—aeting -wifehin t-hc
ii-eeftsee-^-s—aeepe—©d?—pisaeta-e©-;—p-rovidod -roproductivo
health -cage ■scrvicco that are- 3rawgul-ift- thio- State;
- (-3-)- Te the director of heal4:h-fo-r gocordo of a patient of
O'covered cnt-ity in -connection with an -inveotigation
of- a-Gomplaint,—inf—tde -rceor-do -are r-elated to the
cemplaint;—©ft
- H-)- ^f—child abuoe,—abuse of an individual-who i-o sixty
years af—age ©ft—older,—abase-of- an indi-vidual who io
physically di-sabled ©r -incompctont,—or abuse of an
individual wi-th-an- intellectual disability io known or
in-g©od- faith ouopoeted-]
No covered entity shall use or disclose protected health
information for purposes or activities relating to conducting a
civil, criminal, or administrative investigation into any person
for the mere act of seeking, obtaining, providing, or
facilitating reproductive health care services or gender­
affirming health care services, or for purposes or activities
relating to imposing civil, criminal, or administrative
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx
inmifliiiiMmiiiHi

Page 12
H.B. NO.
liability on any person for the mere act of seeking, obtaining,
providing, or facilitating reproductive health care services or
gender-affirming health care services, where the reproductive
health care services or gender-affirming health care services
are:
(1) Lawful under the laws of this State; or
(2) Protected, required, or authorized by. federal law,
including the United States Constitution, under the
circumstances in which such services are provided,
regardless of the state in which they are provided.
For purposes of this subsection, reproductive health care
services or gender-affirming health care services are presumed
lawful unless the covered entity has actual knowledge that the
reproductive health care services or gender-affirming health
care services were not lawful under the circumstances in which
they were provided, or factual information supplied by the
person requesting the use or disclosure of protected health
information demonstrates a substantial factual basis that the
reproductive health care services or gender-affirming health
care services were not lawful under the specific circumstances
in which they were provided.
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 12
linmilMIIIDUIIIIHHDIi

Page 13
H.B. NO.
S.D. 2
(b) When a covered entity receives a request for protected
health information relating to reproductive health care services
or gender-affirming health care services and the request is for;
(1) Health oversight activities, as described in title 45
Code of Federal Regulations section 164.512(d), as
that section may be amended or modified from time to
time;
(2) Judicial and administrative proceedings, as described
in title 45 Code of Federal Regulations section
164.512(e), as that section may be amended or modified
from time to time;
(3) Law enforcement purposes, as described in title 45
Code of Federal Regulations section 164.512(f), as
that section may be amended or modified from time to
time; or
(4) Coroners and medical examiners, as described in title
45 Code of Federal Regulations section 164.512(g)(1),
as that section may be amended or modified from time
to time,
the covered entity may disclose the requested protected health
information; provided that the covered entity obtains from the
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 1

Page 14
H.B. NO. ■ '
person requesting the protected health information a written,
signed attestation that the disclosure is not otherwise
prohibited by subsection (a). Any person who knowingly provides
a false attestation under this section shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to impede
the lawful sharing of [modical rooordo] protected health
information as [permitted by tytafec e-r] required by federal law
or the [rules of the court,—except in -the ease of a subpoena- or
warrant icsued by a court,—gevemmeftt—ageneyT—or ■ Icgie-lafeirve
body of another -stafee -eommanding the production,—copying^—or
inspection of mcd-ical -roeerde -relating to reproductive health
■eere—serviees-r] laws of this State, or as authorized by the
patient or the patient's conservator, guardian, or other
authorized legal representative in a valid, written
authorization for the disclosure that complies with the federal
Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996,
P.L. 104-191, as amended, and federal regulations promulgated
thereunder; provided that a covered entity shall inform the
patient or the patient's conservator, guardian, or other
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 14
IIMIIHIIIBIiaiHlllilil

Page 15
H.B. NO.
authorized legal representative of the patient's right to
withhold the written consent.
(d) As used in this section:
"Covered entity" has the same meaning as in title 45 Code
of Federal Regulations section 160.103, as that section may be
amended or modified from time to time.
"Protected health information" has the same meaning as in
title 45 Code of Federal Regulations section 160.103, as that
section may be amended or modified from time to time.
[-£] §323J-3 [-}-] Subpoenas; when allowed. Notwithstanding
sections 624-27 and 624D-3 or any other law to the contrary, no
court or clerk of a court shall order the issuance of a subpoena
requested by an officer, appointed according to the laws or
usages of another state or government, or by any court of the
United States or of another state or government, in connection
with an out-of-state or interstate investigation or proceeding
relating to reproductive health care services [Icgall-y performed
ift—the] or gender-affirming health care services that are lawful
under the laws of this State.
[-{-] §323J-4 [-}-] Agencies prohibited from providing
information or expending resources. (a) No agency, as defined
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 15
■IIIIWlURmMHIII

Page 16
H.B. NO.
in section 92F-3, or employee, appointee, officer, official, or
any other person acting on behalf of an agency shall provide any
nonpublic information or expend or use time, money, facilities,
property, equipment, personnel, or other resources in
furtherance of any out-of-state or interstate investigation or
proceeding seeking to impose civil or criminal liability upon a
person or entity for:
(1) [The provision,—seeking,] Seeking, receiving, paying
for, [receipt of,] or inquiring about reproductive
health care services [that -arc legal in the] or
gender-affirming health care services that are lawful
under the laws of this State; [er^]
(2) Providing or responding to an inquiry about
reproductive health care services or gender-affirming
health care services that are lawful under the laws of
this State;
[-(-2^] (3) Assisting [any person or entity providing,
seekingT—receiving,—paying for,—e^—reapending—fee—aft
inquiry—about r-eproduotivo -hoal-th oarc -servi-eea-tho-t-
are-legal in the St-ate.-] or aiding or abetting in any
of the conduct described in paragraph (1) or (2); or
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 16

Page 17
H.B. NO.
(4) Attempting or intending to engage in or providing
material support for (or any other theory of
vicarious, attempt, joint, several, or conspiracy
liability derived therefrom) conduct described in
paragraphs (1) to (3).
(b) This section shall not apply to any investigation or
proceeding where the conduct subject to potential liability
under the investigation or proceeding would be subject to
liability under the laws of this State if committed in this
State.
[+1 §323J-5Prohibition on state action. The State
shall not penalize, prosecute, or otherwise take adverse action
against an individual based on the individual's actual,
potential, perceived, or alleged pregnancy or gender-affirming
health care outcomes. The State shall not penalize, prosecute,
or otherwise take adverse action against a person for aiding or
assisting [&]£
(1) A pregnant individual accessing reproductive health
care services [in aceordanco- with] that are lawful
under the laws of [-the] this State and with the
pregnant individual's voluntary consent[—]; or
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 17
■MIHillllNIIIUmMHIin

Page 18
H.B. NO.
S.D. 2
(2) An individual accessing gender-affirming health care
services that are lawful under the laws of this State
and with the individual’s voluntary consent.
[-E]§323J-6[•}•] Denial of demands fox surrender.
Notwithstanding any provision of chapter 832 to the contrary,
the governor shall deny any demand made by the executive
authority of any state for the surrender of any person charged
with a crime under the laws of that state when the alleged crime
involves [the provision or rceeipt of>];
(1) Seeking, receiving, paying for, or [asoiotano-G withr]
inquiring about reproductive health care services [7-]
or gender-affirming health care services;
(2) Providing or responding to an inquiry about
reproductive health care services or gender-affirming
health care services;
(3) Assisting or aiding or abetting in any of the conduct
described in paragraph (1) or (2); or
(4) Attempting or intending to engage in or providing
material support for (or any other theory of
vicarious, attempt, joint, several, or conspiracy
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 18
iniiiimuiiiiiMiii

Page 19
H.B. NO.
liability derived therefrom) conduct described in
paragraphs (1) to (3),
unless the acts forming the basis of the prosecution would also
constitute a criminal offense in this State. This section shall
not apply to demands made under Article IV, section 2, of the
United States Constitution.
[-{•] §323J-7 [■}•] Laws contrary to the public policy of this
State. (a) A law of another state authorizing a civil action
or criminal prosecution based on any of the following [ie] shaJ^
be declared to be contrary to the public policy of this State:
(1) [Receiving,—oecking,—Seeking, receiving, paying
for, or inquiring about reproductive health care
services [t-] or gender-affirming health care services
that are lawful under the laws of this State;
(2) Providing or responding to an inquiry about
reproductive health care services [-#-] or gender­
affirming health care services that are lawful under
the laws of this State;
(3) [Engaging i-n conducyfe the-t anoints or aids or abets tho
p-rov-i-sion or rocoipt of reproducti-vc health care
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 19
■liilMIHBIIIMIIIIWI

Page 20
H.B. NO.
ocgvice-s; ] Assisting or aiding or abetting in any of
tho_conduct_described_in_£a_ra^ra£h__UJ__or__(_2)_2.
(4) Attempting or intending to engage in or providing
material support for (or any other theory of
vicarious, attempt, joint, several or conspiracy
liability derived therefrom) conduct described in
paragraphs (1) to (3)[-r
in-aceorda-ncG—with- the laws of- thio State] .
(b) No law described in subsection (a) shall be applied to
a case or controversy heard in the courts of this State."
SECTION 4. Section 451J-11, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) The department shall deny, revoke, condition, or
suspend a license granted pursuant to this chapter on the
following grounds:
(1) Conviction by a court of competent jurisdiction of a
crime [whieh] that the department has determined, by
rules adopted pursuant to chapter 91, to be of a
nature that renders the person convicted unfit to
practice marriage and family therapy[-^], except when
the conviction was based on the provision or
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 20
HMiinimiiiiiiuiHiiii

Page 21
H.B. NO.
assistance in receipt or provision of gender-affirming
health care services, as defined in section 323J-1, so
long as the provision or assistance in receipt or
provision of the services was in accordance with the
laws of this State or would have been in accordance
with the laws of this State if it occurred within this
State;
(2) Failing to report in writing to the director any
disciplinary decision related to the provision of
mental health services issued against the licensee or
the applicant in any jurisdiction within thirty days
of the disciplinary decision, or within thirty days of
licensure;
(3) Violation of recognized ethical standards for marriage
and family therapists or licensed marriage and family
therapists as set by the association;
(4) Fraud or misrepresentation in obtaining or renewing a
license, including making a false certification of
compliance with the continuing education requirement
set forth in section 451J-10;
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 21

Page 22
H.B. NO. E
S.D. 2
(5) Revocation, suspension, or other disciplinary action
by any state or federal agency against a licensee or
applicant for any reason provided under this
section!-?-] , except when the revocation, suspension, or
other disciplinary action was based on the provision
or assistance in receipt or provision of gender­
affirming health care services, as defined in section
323J-1, so long as the provision or assistance in
receipt or provision of the services was in accordance
with the laws of this State or would have been in
accordance with the laws of this State if it occurred
within this State; or
(6) Other just and sufficient cause that renders a person
unfit to practice marriage and family therapy."
SECTION 5. Section 451J-12, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§45U-12 Confidentiality and privileged communications.
No person licensed as a marriage and family therapist or an
associate marriage and family therapist, nor any of the person's
employees or associates, shall be required to disclose any
information that the person may have acquired in rendering
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 2
iHinniiiiininHwiiH

Page 23
H.B. NO.
S.D. 2
marriage and family therapy services except in the following
circumstances:
(1) As required by law;
(2) To prevent a clear and immediate danger to a person or
persons;
(3) In the course of a civil, criminal, or disciplinary
action arising from the therapy where the therapist is
a defendant [-^] , except when the civil, criminal, or
disciplinary action by another state or federal agency
is based on the provision or assistance in receipt or
provision of gender-affirming health care services, as
defined in section 323J-1, so long as the provision or
assistance in receipt or provision of the services was
in accordance with the laws of this State or would
have been in accordance with the laws of this State if
it occurred within this State;
(4) In a criminal proceeding where the client is a
defendant and the use of the privilege would violate
the defendant's right to a compulsory process of the
right to present testimony and witnesses in the
defendant's own behalf;
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 23
wiiiRiiNiimmiiMH

Page 24
H.B. NO.
(5) In accordance with the terms of a client's previously
written waiver of the privilege; or
(6) Where more than one person in a family jointly
receives therapy and each [family member] person who
is legally competent executes a written waiver [7—
In that instance, a marriage and family therapist or
an associate marriage and family therapist may
disclose information received from any [family -member]
person in accordance with the terms of the person's
waiver."
SECTION 6. Section 453-8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsections (a), (b), and (c) to read as
follows:
"(a) In addition to any other actions authorized by law,
any license to practice medicine and surgery may be revoked,
limited, or suspended by the board at any time in a proceeding
before the board, or may be denied, for any cause authorized by
law, including but not limited to the following:
(1) Procuring, or aiding or abetting in procuring, an
abortion that is unlawful under the laws of this State
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 24

Page 25
H.B. NO.
or that would be unlawful under the laws of this State
if performed within this State;
(2) Employing any person to solicit patients for one's
self ;
(3) Engaging in false, fraudulent, or deceptive
advertising, including but not limited to:
(A) Making excessive claims of expertise in one or
more medical specialty fields;
(B) Assuring a permanent cure for an incurable
disease; or
(C) Making any untruthful and improbable statement in
advertising one’s medical or surgical practice or
business;
(4) Being habituated to the excessive use of drugs or
alcohol; or being addicted to, dependent on, or a
habitual user of a narcotic, barbiturate, amphetamine,
hallucinogen, or other drug having similar effects;
(5) Practicing medicine while the ability to practice is
impaired by alcohol, drugs, physical disability, or
mental instability;
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 25

Page 26
H.B. NO.
(6) Procuring a license through fraud, misrepresentation,
or deceit, or knowingly permitting an unlicensed
person to perform activities requiring a license;
(7) Professional misconduct, hazardous negligence causing
bodily injury to another, or manifest incapacity in
the practice of medicine or surgery;
(8) Incompetence or multiple instances of negligence,
including but not limited to the consistent use of
medical service, [which] that is inappropriate or
unnecessary;
(9) Conduct or practice contrary to recognized standards
of ethics of the medical profession as adopted by the
Hawaii Medical Association, the American Medical
Association, the Hawaii Association of Osteopathic
Physicians and Surgeons, or the American Osteopathic
Association;
(10) Violation of the conditions or limitations upon which
a limited or temporary license is issued;
(11) Revocation, suspension, or other disciplinary action
by another state or federal agency of a license,
certificate, or medical privilege, except when the
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 26
niiiiiiiiiniiiiiiiiBiiii

Page 27
H.B. NO.
revocation, suspension, or other disciplinary action
was based on the provision or assistance in receipt or
provision of [mcdicaly]£
(A) Medical, surgical, pharmaceutical, counseling, or
referral services relating to the human
reproductive system, including but not limited to
services relating to pregnancy, contraception, or
the termination of a pregnancy[—]; or
(B) Gender-affirming health care services, as defined
in section 323J-1,
so long as the provision or assistance in receipt or
provision of the services was in accordance with the
laws of this State or would have been in accordance
with the laws of this State if it occurred within this
State;
(12) Conviction, whether by nolo contendere or otherwise,
of a penal offense substantially related to the
qualifications, functions, or duties of a physician or
osteopathic physician, notwithstanding any statutory
provision to the contrary, except when the conviction
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 27
MilHIilllMIUMiailllH

Page 28
H.B. NO.
was based on the provision or assistance in receipt or
provision of [medical, ] j_
(A) Medical, surgical, pharmaceutical, counseling, or
referral services relating to the human
reproductive system, including but not limited to
services relating to pregnancy, contraception, or
the termination of a pregnancy[y]; or
(B) Gender-affirming health care services, as defined
in section 323J-1,
so long as the provision or assistance in receipt or
provision of the services was in accordance with the
laws of this State or would have been in accordance
with the laws of this State if it occurred within this
State;
(13) Violation of chapter 329, the uniform controlled
substances act, or any rule adopted thereunder except
as provided in section 329-122;
(14) Failure to report to the board, in writing, any
disciplinary decision issued against the licensee or
the applicant in another jurisdiction within thirty
days after the disciplinary decision is issued; or
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 2
iiniiniiiiniiiiiiiiiiiiininiiii

Page 29 1875
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
(15) Submitting to or filing with the board any notice,
statement, or other document required under this
chapter [7—whieh] th^ is false or untrue or contains
any material misstatement or omission of fact.
(b) If disciplinary action related to the practice of
medicine has been taken against the applicant by another state
or federal agency, or if the applicant reveals a physical or
mental condition that would constitute a violation under this
section, then the board may impose one or more of the following
requirements as a condition for licensure:
(1) Physical and mental evaluation of the applicant by a
licensed physician or osteopathic physician approved
by the board;
(2) Probation, including conditions of probation such as
requiring observation of the licensee by an
appropriate group or society of licensed physicians,
osteopathic physicians, or surgeons;
(3) Limitation of the license by restricting the fields of
practice in which the licensee may engage;
(4) Further education or training or proof of performance
competency; and
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 29
■niiiiniiBiiinniiB

Page 30
H.B. NO.
(5) Limitation of the medical practice of the licensee in
any reasonable manner to assure the safety and welfare
of the consuming public;
provided that the board shall not impose as a condition for
licensure any of the requirements pursuant to this subsection if
the disciplinary action related to the practice of medicine
taken against the applicant was based on the provision or
assistance in receipt or provision of medical, surgical,
pharmaceutical, counseling, or referral services relating to the
human reproductive system, including but not limited to services
relating to pregnancy, contraception, or the termination of a
pregnancy, or the provision or assistance in receipt or
provision of gender-affirming health care services, as defined
in section 323J-1, so long as the provision or assistance in
receipt or provision of the services was in accordance with the
laws of this State or would have been in accordance with the
laws of this State if it occurred within this State.
(c) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the
board may deny a license to any applicant who has been
disciplined by another state or federal agency, except on the
basis of discipline for the provision or assistance in receipt
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 30
■■iHiiiiiiiiiaiHiniii

Page 31
H.B. NO. E
or provision of medical, surgical, pharmaceutical, counseling,
or referral services relating to the human reproductive system,
including but not limited to services relating to pregnancy,
contraception, or the termination of a pregnancy, or the
provision or assistance in receipt or provision of
gender-affirming health care services, as defined in section
323J-1, so long as the provision or assistance in receipt or
provision of the services was in accordance with the laws of
this State or would have been in accordance with the laws of
this State if it occurred within this State. Any final order of
discipline taken pursuant to this subsection shall be a matter
of public record."
SECTION 7. Section 453-8.6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By amending subsection (a) to read:
"(a) Upon receipt of evidence of revocation, suspension,
or other disciplinary action against a licensee by another state
or federal agency, the board may issue an order imposing
disciplinary action upon the licensee on the following
conditions:
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 31
iifliiiiniioiliiiiiiiMiniiniiii

Page 32
H.B. NO.
(1) The board shall serve the licensee with a proposed
order imposing disciplinary action as required by
chapter 91;
(2) The licensee shall have the right to request a hearing
pursuant to chapter 91 to show cause why the action
described in the proposed order should not be imposed;
(3) Any request for a hearing shall be made in writing and
filed with the board within twenty days after mailing
of the proposed order to the licensee; and
(4) If the licensee does not submit a written request for
a hearing within twenty days after mailing of the
proposed order, the board may issue a final order
imposing the disciplinary action described in the
proposed order;
provided that the board shall not issue an order imposing
disciplinary action upon the licensee if the revocation,
suspension, or other disciplinary action against a licensee by
another state was based on the provision or assistance in
receipt or provision of medical, surgical, pharmaceutical,
counseling, or referral services relating to the human
reproductive system, including but not limited to services
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx :
MniiiiiiiianiiHiiiiiiliili

Page 33
H.B. NO.
relating to pregnancy, contraception, or the termination of a
pregnancy, or the provision or assistance in receipt or
provision of gender-affirming health care services, as defined
in section 323J-1, so long as the provision or assistance in
receipt or provision of the services was in accordance with the
laws of this State or would have been in accordance with the
laws of this State if it occurred within this State."
2. By amending subsection (c) to read:
"(c) A licensee against whom the board has issued a
proposed order under this section shall be prohibited from
practicing in this State until the board issues a final order
if:
(1) The licensee was the subject of disciplinary action by
another state, except where the disciplinary action
against the licensee by another state was based on the
provision or assistance in receipt or provision of
[medical—]£
(A) Medical, surgical, pharmaceutical, counseling, or
referral services relating to the human
reproductive system, including but not limited to
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 33

Page 34
H.B. NO.
services relating to pregnancy, contraception, or
the termination of a pregnancy[—]; or
(B) Gender-affirming health care services, as defined
in section 323J-1,
so long as the provision or assistance in receipt or
provision of the services was in accordance with the
laws of this State or would have been in accordance
with the laws of this State if it occurred within this
State; and
(2) The disciplinary action by another state prohibits the
licensee from practicing in that state."
SECTION 8. Section 453D-12, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) In addition to any other acts or conditions provided
by law, the director may refuse to renew, reinstate, or restore,
and may deny, revoke, suspend, or condition in any manner, any
license for any one or more of the following acts or conditions
on the part of a licensee or license applicant:
(1) Failing to meet or maintain the conditions and
requirements necessary to qualify for the granting of
a license;
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 34
nniimiiiiinaMm

Page 35
H.B. NO.
(2) Engaging in false, fraudulent, or deceptive
advertising, or making untruthful or improbable
statements;
(3) Being addicted to, dependent on, or a habitual user of
a narcotic, barbiturate, amphetamine, hallucinogen,
opium, cocaine, or other drugs or derivatives of a
similar nature;
(4) Practicing the licensed profession while impaired by
alcohol, drugs, physical disability, or mental
instability;
(5) Procuring a license through fraud, misrepresentation,
or deceit;
(6) Aiding and abetting an unlicensed person to directly
or indirectly perform activities requiring a license;
(7) Professional misconduct, incompetence, gross
negligence, or manifest incapacity, in the practice of
the licensed profession;
(8) Engaging in conduct or practice contrary to recognized
standards of ethics for the licensed profession;
(9) Violating any condition or limitation upon which a
conditional or temporary license was issued;
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 3
lilllHnillMIIIIIIIIRIiMlli

Page 36
H.B. NO.
(10) Engaging in business under a past or present license
issued pursuant to the licensing laws, in a manner
causing injury to one or more members of the public;
(11) Failing to comply with, observe, or adhere to any law
in a manner [such] that the director deems the
applicant or holder to be an unfit or improper person
to hold a license;
(12) Having had a license revoked or suspended, or having
been the subject of other disciplinary action, by
another state or a federal agency for any reason
provided by the licensing laws or this section [•^]^
except when the revocation, suspension, or other
disciplinary action was based on the provision or
assistance in receipt or provision of gender-affirming
health care services, as defined in section 323J-1, so
long as the provision or assistance in receipt or
provision of the services was in accordance with the
laws of this State or would have been in accordance
with the laws of this State if it occurred within this
State;
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 36

Page 37
H.B. NO.
(13) Having been convicted of a crime, whether by nolo
contendere or otherwise, directly related to the
qualifications, functions, or duties of the licensed
profession [-?-], except when the conviction was based on
the provision or assistance in receipt or provision of
gender-affirming health care services, as defined in
section 323J-1, so long as the provision or assistance
in receipt or provision of the services was in
accordance with the laws of this State or would have
been in accordance with the laws of this State if it
occurred within this State;
(14) Failing to report in writing to the director any
disciplinary decision issued against the licensee or
applicant in another jurisdiction within thirty days
of the disciplinary decision;
(15) Employing, utilizing, or attempting to employ or
utilize, at any time, any person not licensed under
the licensing laws where licensure is required; or
(16) Violating this chapter, chapter 436B, or any rule or
order of the director."
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 37

Page 38
H.B. NO.
SECTION 9. Section 453D-13, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§453D-13 Confidentiality and privileged communications.
No person licensed as a mental health counselor or an associate
mental health counselor, nor any of the person's employees or
associates, shall be required to disclose any information that
the person may have acquired in rendering mental health
counseling services, except in the following circumstances:
(1) As required by law;
(2) To prevent a clear and imminent danger to a person or
persons;
(3) In accordance with the terms of a previously written
waiver of the privilege where the waiver is executed
by the client or by the client's legally recognized
representative;
(4) Where more than one person jointly receives counseling
and each person who is legally competent executes a
written waiver. In that instance, information may be
disclosed from any person in accordance with that
person's waiver; or
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 38
■■MllHflilllHiH

Page 39
H.B. NO.
(5) In the course of a disciplinary action or pursuant to
a duly authorized subpoena issued by the
department [-r], except when the disciplinary action by
another state or federal agency is based on the
provision or assistance in receipt or provision of
gender-affirming health care services, as defined in
section 323J-1, so long as the provision or assistance
in receipt or provision of the services was in
accordance with the laws of this State or would have
been in accordance with the laws of this State if it
occurred within this State."
SECTION 10. Section 457-12, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsections (a) and (b) to read as follows:
"(a) In addition to any other actions authorized by law,
the board shall have the power to deny, revoke, limit, or
suspend any license to practice nursing as a registered nurse or
as a licensed practical nurse applied for or issued by the board
in accordance with this chapter, and to fine or to otherwise
discipline a licensee for any cause authorized by law, including
but not limited to the following:
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 39
MIIHHIIIIHHIIHIIiniiH

Page 40
H.B. NO. -=2
(1) Fraud or deceit in procuring or attempting to procure
a license to practice nursing as a registered nurse or
as a licensed practical nurse;
(2) Gross immorality;
(3) Unfitness or incompetence by reason of negligence,
habits, or other causes;
(4) Habitual intemperance, addiction to, or dependency on
alcohol or other habit-forming substances;
(5) Mental incompetence;
(6) Unprofessional conduct as defined by the board in
accordance with its own rules;
(7) Wilful or repeated violation of any of the provisions
of this chapter or any rule adopted by the board;
(8) Revocation, suspension, limitation, or other
disciplinary action by another state of a nursing
license, except when the revocation, suspension,
limitation, or other disciplinary action by another
state was based on the provision or assistance in
receipt or provision of [jfte^iedi-r]
(A) Medical, surgical, pharmaceutical, counseling, or
referral services relating to the human
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 40
MMIIIIlllMillimilMIH

Page 41
H.B. NO.
reproductive system, including but not limited to
services relating to pregnancy, contraception, or
the termination of a pregnancy [7-] >* or
Gender-affirming health care services, as defined
in section 323J-1,
so long as the provision or assistance in receipt or
provision of the services was in accordance with the
laws of this State or would have been in accordance
with the laws of this State if it occurred within this
State;
(9) Conviction, whether by nolo contendere or otherwise,
of a penal offense substantially related to the
qualifications, functions, or duties of a nurse,
notwithstanding any statutory provision to the
contrary, except when the conviction was based on the
provision or assistance in receipt or provision of
[mcdi-cal,]
(A) Medical, surgical, pharmaceutical, counseling, or
referral services relating to the human
reproductive system, including but not limited to
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 41
immmiMiiiB

Page 42
H.B. NO. --
services relating to pregnancy, contraception, or
the termination of a pregnancy!—]; or
(B) Gender-affirming health care services, as defined
in section 323J-1,
so long as the provision or assistance in receipt or
provision of the services was in accordance with the
laws of this State or would have been in accordance
with the laws of this State if it occurred within this
State;
(10) Failure to report to the board any disciplinary action
taken against the licensee in another jurisdiction
within thirty days after the disciplinary action
becomes final;
(11) Submitting to or filing with the board any notice,
statement, or other document required under this
chapter [7—wh4-eh] that is false or untrue or contains
any material misstatement of fact, including a false
attestation of compliance with continuing competency
requirements; or
(12) Violation of the conditions or limitations upon which
any license is issued.
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 42
WIIMWIliMliNMIII

Page 43
H.B. NO.
(b) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the
board may deny a license to any applicant who has been
disciplined by another state, except on the basis of discipline
by another state for the provision or assistance in receipt or
provision of [mediealrT-]
(1) Medical, surgical, pharmaceutical, counseling, or
referral services relating to the human reproductive
system, including but not limited to services relating
to pregnancy, contraception, or the termination of a
pregnancy [7-] ; or
(2) Gender-affirming health care services, as defined in
section 323J-1,
so long as the provision or assistance in receipt or provision
of the services was in accordance with the laws of this State or
would have been in accordance with the laws of this State if it
occurred within this State. Any final order entered pursuant to
this subsection shall be a matter of public record."
SECTION 11. Section 457-12.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By amending subsection (a) to read:
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 43

Page 44
H.B. NO.
S.D. 2
"(a) Upon receipt of evidence of revocation, suspension,
or other disciplinary action against a licensee in another
state, the board may issue an order imposing disciplinary action
upon the licensee on the following conditions:
(1) The board shall serve the licensee with a proposed
order imposing disciplinary action as required by
chapter 91;
(2) The licensee shall have the right to request a hearing
pursuant to chapter 91 to show cause why the action
described in the proposed order should not be imposed;
(3) Any request for a hearing shall be made in writing and
filed with the board within twenty days after mailing
of the proposed order to the licensee; and
(4) If the licensee does not submit a written request for
a hearing within twenty days after mailing of the
proposed order, the board shall issue a final order
imposing the disciplinary action described in the
proposed order;
provided that the board shall not issue an order imposing
disciplinary action upon the licensee if the revocation,
suspension, or other disciplinary action against a licensee by
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 4
IIIMIilMIIHlIillH

Page 45
H.B. NO.
another state was based on the provision or assistance in
receipt or provision of medical, surgical, pharmaceutical,
counseling, or referral services relating to the human
reproductive system, including but not limited to services
relating to pregnancy, contraception, or the termination of a
pregnancy, or the provision or assistance in receipt or
provision of gender-affirming health care services, as defined
in section 323J-1, so long as the provision or assistance in
receipt or provision of the services was in accordance with the
laws of this State or would have been in accordance with the
laws of this State if it occurred within this State."
2. By amending subsection (c) to read:
"(c) A licensee against whom the board has issued a
proposed order under this section shall be prohibited from
practicing in this State until the board issues a final order
if :
(1) The licensee was the subject of disciplinary action by
another state, except where the disciplinary action
against the licensee by another state was based on the
provision or assistance in receipt or provision of
[mcdicalv]:
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 45
iiiiiMiiHiiiMunniiiBin

Page 46
H.B. NO.
(A) Medical, surgical, pharmaceutical, counseling, or
referral services relating to the human
reproductive system, including but not limited to
services relating to pregnancy, contraception, or
the termination of a pregnancy [7-]; or
(B) Gender-affirming health care services, as defined
in section 323J-1,
so long as the provision or assistance in receipt or
provision of the services was in accordance with the
laws of this State or would have been in accordance
with the laws of this State if it occurred within this
State; and
(2) The disciplinary action in the other state prohibits
the licensee from practicing in that state."
SECTION 12. Section 461-21.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By amending subsection (a) to read:
"(a) Upon receipt of evidence of revocation, suspension,
or other disciplinary action against a licensee by another state
or federal agency, the board may issue an order imposing
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 46
iiiinniMimHHiii

Page 47
H.B. NO.
disciplinary action upon the licensee on the following
conditions:
(1) The board shall serve the licensee with a proposed
order imposing disciplinary action as required by
chapter 91;
(2) The licensee shall have the right to request a hearing
pursuant to chapter 91 to show cause why the action
described in the proposed order should not be imposed;
(3) Any request for a hearing shall be made in writing and
filed with the board within twenty days after mailing
of the proposed order to the licensee; and
(4) If the licensee does not submit a written request for
a hearing within twenty days after mailing of the
proposed order, the board shall issue a final order
imposing the disciplinary action described in the
proposed order;
provided that the board shall not issue an order imposing
disciplinary action upon the licensee if the revocation,
suspension, or other disciplinary action against a licensee by
another state was based on the provision or assistance in
receipt or provision of medical, surgical, pharmaceutical.
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 47
niVMHIMIliimHiHI

Page 48
H.B. NO.
counseling, or referral services relating to the human
reproductive system, including but not limited to services
relating to pregnancy, contraception, or the termination of a
pregnancy, or the provision or assistance in receipt or
provision of gender-affirming health care services, as defined
in section 323J-1, so long as the provision or assistance in
receipt or provision of the services was in accordance with the
laws of this State or would have been in accordance with the
laws of this State if it occurred within this State."
2. By amending subsection (c) to read:
"(c) A licensee against whom the board has issued a
proposed order under this section shall be prohibited from
practicing in this State until the board issues a final order
if:
(1) The licensee was the subject of disciplinary action by
another state, except where the disciplinary action
against the licensee by another state was based on the
provision or assistance in receipt or provision of
[ffte^iea4rr] £
(A) Medical, surgical, pharmaceutical, counseling, or
referral services relating to the human
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 48
iimmniMMw

Page 49
H.B. NO.
reproductive system, including but not limited to
services relating to pregnancy, contraception, or
the termination of a pregnancy[—]; or
(B) Gender-affirming health care services, as defined
iP__sectAon_323Jj212_
so long as the provision or assistance in receipt or
provision of the services was in accordance with the
laws of this State or would have been in accordance
with the laws of this State if it occurred within this
State; and
(2) The disciplinary action by another state prohibits the
licensee from practicing in that state."
SECTION 13. Section 465-13, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) In addition to any other actions authorized by law,
the board shall refuse to grant a license to any applicant and
may revoke or suspend any license, or may place a license or
[fftay] put a license holder on conditional probation, for any
cause authorized by law, including but not limited to the
following:
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 49
innilBHMIIIMIIIliH

Page 50 1875
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
(1) Professional misconduct, gross carelessness, manifest
incapacity, or incompetency in the practice of
psychology;
(2) Violation of this chapter by the applicant within one
year of the application, or violation of this chapter
by a license holder any time the license is valid;
(3) Any unethical practice of psychology as defined by the
board in accordance with its own rules;
(4) Fraud or deception in applying for or procuring a
license to practice psychology as defined in section
465-1;
(5) Conviction of a crime substantially related to the
qualifications, functions, or duties of
psychologists , except when the conviction was based
IS on the provision or assistance in receipt or provision
of gender-affirming health care services, as defined
in section 323J-1, so long as the provision or
assistance in receipt or provision of the services was
in accordance with the laws of this State or would
have been in accordance with the laws of this State if
it occurred jvithiui thi^£S^
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 50
HMIIliUMIUn

Page 51
H.B. NO.
(6) Wilful unauthorized communication of information
received in professional confidence;
(7) The suspension, revocation, or imposition of
probationary conditions by another state of a license
or certificate to practice psychology issued by that
state if the act for which the disciplinary action was
taken constitutes a violation of this chapter;
(8) The commission of any dishonest, corrupt, or
fraudulent act or any act of sexual abuse, or sexual
relations with a client, or sexual misconduct that is
substantially related to the qualifications,
functions, or duties of a psychologist;
(9) Harassment, intimidation, or abuse, sexual or
otherwise, of a client or patient;
(10) Exercising undue influence in the manner as to exploit
the client, patient, student, or supervisee for
financial or other personal advantage to the
practitioner or a third party;
(11) Conviction of fraud in filing medicaid claims or
conviction of fraud in filing claims to any third
party payor, for which a copy of the record of
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx
nillMillilllHHHHIIIMIMII

Page 52
H.B. NO.
conviction, certified by the clerk of the court
entering the conviction, shall be conclusive evidence;
(12) Aiding or abetting any unlicensed person to engage in
the practice of psychology;
(13) Repeated acts of excessive treatment or use of
diagnostic procedures as determined by the standard of
the local community of licensees;
(14) Inability to practice psychology with reasonable skill
and safety to patients or clients by reason of
illness, inebriation, or excessive use of any
substance, or as a result of any mental or physical
condition;
(15) Conviction of any crime or offense that reflects the
inability of the practitioner to practice psychology
with due regard for the health and safety of clients
or patients;
(16) Use of untruthful or deceptive or improbable
statements concerning the licensee's qualifications or
the effects or results of proposed treatment;
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 52
■liniinnHiMiHiiH

Page 53
H.B. NO.
(17) Functioning outside of the licensee’s professional
competence established by education, training, and
experience;
(18) Refusal to comply with any written order of the board
(19) Making any fraudulent or untrue statement to the
board, including a false certification of compliance
with the continuing education requirement of section
465-11; or
(20) Violation of a board rule."
SECTION 14. Section 636C-9, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" t-tl §636C-9 [■}■] Enforcement of foreign penal civil actions
relating to protected reproductive health care services [-r] or
protected gender-affirming health care services. (a) No
judgment or other order arising from a foreign penal civil
action or other penal law banning, restricting, burdening,
punishing, penalizing, or otherwise interfering with the
provision of protected reproductive health care services or
protected gender-affirming health care services shall be
enforced in this State.
(b) As used in this section:
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 53
HWimmiiiHiiH

Page 54
H.B. NO.
"Foreign penal civil action" means an action authorized by
the law of a state, or of any municipality or other governmental
entity within a state, other than this State, the essential
character and effect of which is to punish an offense against
the public justice of that state, municipality, or other
governmental entity.
"Gender-affirming health care services" has the same
meaning as defined in section 323J-1.
"Protected gender-affirming health care services" means
gender-affirming health care services that are protected under
the Hawaii State Constitution or are otherwise lawful under the
laws of this State or that would be constitutionally protected
or otherwise lawful if performed within this State.
"Protected reproductive health care services" means
medical, surgical, pharmaceutical, counseling, or referral
services relating to the human reproductive system, including
but not limited to services relating to pregnancy,
contraception, or termination of a pregnancy, that are protected
under the Hawaii State Constitution or are otherwise lawful
under the laws of this State or that would be constitutionally
protected or otherwise lawful if performed within this State."
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 54
HiMiiinniiiinnH

Page 55
H.B. NO.
SECTION 15. Section 836-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§836-2 Summoning witness in this State to testify in
another state. (a) If a judge of a court of record in any
state [whieh] that by its laws has made provision for commanding
persons within that state to attend and testify in this State
certifies under the seal of that court that there is a criminal
prosecution pending in that court, or that a grand jury
investigation has commenced or is about to commence, that a
person in this State is a material witness in the prosecution or
grand jury investigation, and that the person's presence will be
required for a specified number of days, upon presentation of
the certificate to any judge of a court of record in this State
in the judicial district in which the person is, the judge shall
fix a time and place for a hearing, and shall make an order
directing the witness to appear at a time and place certain for
the hearing.
(b) If at a hearing the judge determines that the witness
is material and necessary, that it will not cause undue hardship
to the witness to be compelled to attend and testify in the
prosecution or a grand jury investigation in the other state.
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 55
■ifliimiHiuinniiiHg

Page 56
H.B. NO.
and that the laws of the state in which the prosecution is
pending, or grand jury investigation has commenced or is about
to commence, and of any other state through which the witness
may be required to pass by ordinary course of travel, will give
to the witness protection from arrest and the service of civil
and criminal process, the judge shall issue a summons, with a
copy of the certificate attached, directing the witness to
attend and testify in the court where the prosecution is
pending, or where a grand jury investigation has commenced or is
about to commence at a time and place specified in the summons [7-
exccpt]; provided that no judge shall issue a summons in a case
where prosecution is pending, or where a grand jury
investigation has commenced or is about to commence for a
criminal violation of a law of another state involving
previ-sitenv ]
(1) Seeking, receiving, paying for, [receipt ■ of-,—et
a&o-iata-nee with] or inquiring about reproductive
health care services [ao--de-f-ined-'in■ ■section 323J-1] or
gender-affirming health care services;
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 56
■HiHIHinnHIIHII

Page 57
H.B. NO.
^0^
(2) Proyld2Ji2 or res£onddJT^t^aji 2jic[uiry aboi^
reproductive health care services or gender-affirming
health care services;
(3) Assisting or aiding or abetting in any of the conduct
described in paragraph (1) or (2); or
(4) Attempting or intending to engage in or providing'
material support for (or any other theory of
vicarious, attempt, joint, several, or conspiracy
liability derived therefrom) conduct described in
paragraphs (1) to (3),
unless the acts forming the basis of the prosecution or
investigation would also constitute an offense in this State.
In any hearing, the certificate shall be prima facie evidence of
all the facts stated therein.
(c) If the certificate recommends that the witness be
taken into immediate custody and delivered to an officer of the
requesting state to assure the witness' attendance in the
requesting state, the judge may, in lieu of notification of the
hearing, direct that the witness be forthwith brought before the
judge for the hearing; and the judge at the hearing being
satisfied of the desirability of the custody and delivery, for
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 57
HMiinWRHMMIIIII

Page 58
H.B. NO.
I. 1
which determination the certificate shall be prima facie proof
of the desirability may, in lieu of issuing subpoena or summons,
order that the witness be forthwith taken into custody and
delivered to an officer of the requesting state.
(d) If the witness, who is summoned pursuant to this
section, after being paid or tendered by some properly
authorized person a sum equivalent to the cost of round-trip air
fare to the place where the prosecution is pending and $30 for
each day, that the witness is required to travel and attend as a
witness, fails without good cause to attend and testify as
directed in the summons, the witness shall be punished in the
manner provided for the punishment of any witness who disobeys a
summons issued from a court of record in this State.
(e) As used in this section;
"Gender-affirming health care services" has the same
meaning as defined in section 323J-1.
2^R^£roductdv^2ieal^tli car;e se£yi£es2Mhas the same jrieajiiuig a£
defined in section 323J-1."
SECTION 16. If any provision of this Act, or the
application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held
invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or
2026-2143 HB1875 SD2 SMA.docx 58
miBillinfllWHIIHHH

Page 59
H.B. NO.
applications of the Act that can be given effect without the
invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions
of this Act are severable.
SECTION 17. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 18. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
i2i02i6i-i2i1n43 iHiBi1M875 iSmD2 SiMiAi.idioicixi 59

H.B. NO.
APPROVED this 29th day of May ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1875, HD 2, SD 2
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; April 23, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B.No. 1875, H.D. 2, S.D. 2
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 14, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
3798